Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-224.03
Domestic stock company; bulk reinsurance; contract; approval.

(1) Any domestic stock insurance company may cede its business to another licensed insurer by a contract of bulk reinsurance, but such contract shall not become effective unless first filed with and approved by the director and thereafter approved by a majority vote of the shareholders of the ceding company present in person or by proxy and voting at an annual meeting or at a special meeting called for that purpose.

(2) The director shall approve such contract within a reasonable time after such filing unless he or she finds it is inequitable to the shareholders or policyholders of both insurers. If the director does not approve the contract, he or she shall so notify the respective insurers in writing specifying his or her reasons therefor. If approved by the director, the contract shall then be submitted to the shareholders of the ceding company for their approval as provided in subsection (1) of this section. If approved by the required vote of the shareholders, the contract shall then become effective.

Laws 1957, c. 180, § 3, p. 620;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 73.